Massachusetts, session 194th, H3118.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a special commission to conduct a comprehensive study relative to
generating revenue from digital advertising that is displayed inside of Massachusetts by
companies that generate over $100 million a year in global revenue. The commission shall
examine the experiences and policy efforts of other states relating taxing digital advertising.
The commission shall file its final report and its recommendations for legislation with
the clerks of the senate and house of representatives not later than March 15, 2026, and shall
convene its first meeting not later than September 1, 2025. The report shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) the total amount of taxes currently paid by the identified companies; (ii) the
changes in revenue collected by the commonwealth as a result of any proposed tax law revisions;
of 2

(iii)) tax rates necessary to fund investment in public infrastructure and programing; (iv)
recommendations for changes in laws to achieve an equitable and adequate system of taxation;
(v) the best practices of other states; (vi) tax rates necessary to ensure economic competitiveness
with peer and competitor states; (vii) tax rates that do not discourage robust private sector
investment in capital equipment and the state’s work force; (viii) suggested revenue uses to
benefit all residents of the Commonwealth including but limited to the creation of a program to
improve broadband internet to communities that do not have reliable broadband internet access,
the creation of an annual matching grant program to upgrade internet access in k-12 school
districts, the creation of an annual matching grant program to upgrade computer technology and
remote learning capabilities in k-12 school districts, the creation of a program to improve
internet access in public parks, to evaluate the adequacy of the Commonwealth’s and its
municipalities cyber security, the creation of a municipal cybersecurity grant program.
The commission shall consist of the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
revenue or the chairs’ designees, who shall serve as co-chairs of the commission; secretary of
administration and finance or the secretary’s designee; 2 people who shall be appointed by the
president of the senate, 2 people who shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House; the
minority leader of the house of representatives or a designee; the minority leader of the senate or
a designee; the commissioner of the department of revenue or the commissioner's designee, and
2 members to be appointed by the governor who shall have expertise in economics or tax policy.
of 2